Utah statutes.
53A-6-305.    Meetings and expenses of UPPAC members.

(1)  UPPAC shall meet at least quarterly and at the call of the chair or of a majority of the members.

(2)  Members of UPPAC serve without compensation but are allowed reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses under the rules of the Division of Finance.

(3)  The board shall pay reimbursement to UPPAC members out of the Professional Practices Restricted Subfund in the Uniform School Fund.



Enacted by Chapter 108, 1999 General Session

